Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 31 Governmental Tort Liability

9-31-1.
Tort liability of state.

The state of Rhode Island and any political subdivision thereof, including all cities and towns, shall, subject to the period of limitations set forth in §

9-1-25

, hereby be liable in all actions of tort in the same manner as a private individual or corporation; provided, however, that any recovery in any such action shall not exceed the monetary limitations thereof set forth in this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided herein, neither the State nor any other public body of the State of Rhode Island shall have any liability for any claim arising prior to December 31, 2002, from the failure of a computer, software program, database, network, information system, firmware, embedded chip, or any other device, whether operated by or on behalf of the State of Rhode Island or one of its agencies, departments, divisions, or any public body as defined in §

9-1-31.1(a)(1)

, to interpret, produce, calculate, generate, or account for a date(s) or time(s) which date(s) or time(s) is associated with the year 2000 date change. This provision of this section shall apply without limitation to cities, towns, school committees, regional school committees, housing authorities, public libraries, sewer district, water districts, fire districts, agencies, authorities, boards, committees, subcommittees, councils and commissions. Provided that nothing herein contained shall exempt any public body from liability:

For acts or omissions not in good faith, or

For any malicious, willful, wanton, reckless or grossly negligent acts or omissions.

Provided that the public entity will only be liable for the proportion of damages attributable to its own degree of fault, and provided further that any such liability shall be governed by the monetary limitations of this chapter.

History of Section.

P. L. 1970, ch. 181, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 172, § 1.

9-31-2.
Limitations of damages — State.

In any tort action against the state of Rhode Island or any political subdivision thereof, any damages recovered therein shall not exceed the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000); provided, however, that in all instances in which the state was engaged in a proprietary function in the commission of the tort, or in any situation whereby the state has agreed to indemnify the federal government or any agency thereof for any tort liability, the limitation on damages set forth in this section shall not apply.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 181, § 2; P.L. 1974, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 87, § 1.

9-31-2.1.
Limitation of damages — State — Commuter rail service.

Agreements between the state and a railroad for the provision of commuter rail service shall provide that the state shall secure and maintain a liability insurance policy covering the liability of the state and the railroad for property damage, personal injury, bodily injury, and death arising out of the commuter rail service. The policy shall name the state as named insured, and the railroad as an additional insured, shall have policy limits of not less than seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) per occurrence annually and seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) in the aggregate annually, and shall be subject to self-insured retention in an amount up to seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000). In no event shall the state or the railroad be liable in excess of the coverage limits of the insurance policy for any and all claims for damage, whether compensatory or punitive, for property damage, personal injury, bodily injury, and death arising out of the commuter rail service.

For the purposes of this section, the term “railroad” shall include any person, railroad corporation, or other legal entity in the business of providing rail transportation that contracts with the state for the provision of commuter rail services and the term “commuter rail service” shall include all services performed by a railroad pursuant to a contract with the state in connection with the transportation of rail passengers including, but not limited to, the operation of trains, trackage, and equipment, or the construction, reconstruction, or maintenance of railroad equipment, tracks, and any appurtenant facilities or the provision of trackage rights over lines owned by any such railroad.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 623, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 634, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 18; P.L. 2018, ch. 231, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 258, § 2.

9-31-3.
Limitation of damages — Cities, towns, and fire districts.

In any tort action against any city or town or any fire district, any damages recovered therein shall not exceed the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000); provided, however, that in all instances in which the city or town or fire district was engaged in a proprietary function in the commission of the tort, the limitation of damages set forth in this section shall not apply.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 181, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 128, § 1.

9-31-4.
Damages in excess of limitation.

The general assembly may, by special act, authorize actions of tort against cities and towns and fire districts in particular cases in which the amount of damages to be recovered may exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 181, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 128, § 1.

9-31-5.
Claim appropriations.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, the general assembly may make such appropriations as it shall deem proper in payment of or settlement of claims against the state; provided, however, that there is hereby appropriated out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated a sum sufficient to pay claims against the state settled pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of that sum.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 181, § 2; P. L. 1973, ch. 255, § 1.

9-31-6.
Attorney general to appear.

In any action pursuant to this chapter against the state of Rhode Island, the attorney general, or any assistant attorney general authorized by him or her, shall represent the state in the action. The attorney general is authorized to compromise or settle any claim cognizable under this chapter after the institution of suit thereon, with the approval of the court in which the suit is pending.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 181, § 2.

9-31-7.
Attorney for service.

In any action pursuant to this chapter against the state of Rhode Island, the attorney general is hereby designated as attorney for service for the state in the action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 181, § 2.

9-31-8.
Defense of state employees — Attorney general.

Except as provided in §

9-31-9

, the attorney general shall, upon a written request of an employee or former employee of the state of Rhode Island, defend any action brought against the state employee or former state employee, on account of an act or omission that occurred within the scope of his or her employment with the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 259, § 1.

9-31-9.
Refusal to defend — Attorney general.

The attorney general may refuse to defend an action referred to in §

9-31-8

if he or she determines that:

The act or omission was not within the scope of employment;

The act or the failure to act was because of actual fraud, willful misconduct, or actual malice;

The defense of the action or proceeding by the attorney general would create a conflict of interest between the state of Rhode Island and the employee or former employee;

Within ten (10) days of the time he or she is served with any summons, complaint, process, notice, demand, or pleading, the employee or former employee fails to deliver the original or a copy thereof to the attorney general or his or her designee; or

The state employee or former state employee refuses to cooperate fully with the attorney general’s defense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 259, § 1.

9-31-10.
Exclusive control over litigation.

Whenever the attorney general defends a state employee or former state employee pursuant to §§

9-31-8

—

9-31-12

, the attorney general shall assume exclusive control over the representation of the employee or former state employee, and the employee or former state employee shall cooperate fully with the attorney general’s defense. The attorney general is authorized to compromise or settle any claims after the institution of suit thereon, with the approval of the court in which the suit is pending.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 259, § 1.

9-31-11.
Conflict — Payment of counsel fees by state.

In the event there is a conflict of interest or the attorney general determines it is not in the best interest of the state or the state employee or former state employee to represent him or her, the state shall pay for reasonable counsel fees; provided, however, that the attorney general shall consult in advance with the prospective counsel to establish the parameters within which the state will be liable for attorneys’ fees; and provided, further, that their reasonableness shall ultimately be reviewed and approved by the court before paid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 259, § 1.

9-31-12.
Indemnification — Reservation of obligation — Certification.

The state reserves the right to determine whether or not it will indemnify any employees defended pursuant to §§

9-31-8

—

9-31-11

, if a judgment is rendered against the employee.

Upon certification by the court in which the tort action against a state employee is pending that (1) the defendant employee was acting within the scope of his or her office or employment when the claim arose, and (2) the claim does not arise out of actual fraud, willful misconduct, or actual malice by the employee, any civil action or proceeding commenced upon the claim under this statute shall be deemed to be an action or proceeding brought against the state under the provisions of this title and all references thereto, and the state shall be substituted as the party defendant.

Nothing in this section shall affect the obligations of any insurer, including the obligation to defend and satisfy any settlement or award.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 259, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 45, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 377, § 1.

9-31-13.
Arbitration of claims.

All actions brought under this chapter may, upon agreement of all parties to the action, be submitted to arbitration in accordance with §

8-6-5

and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, except that the state, its departments, agencies, boards, and commissions shall not be required to pay a filing fee for objecting to the arbitrator’s award and demanding a trial.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 401, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 159, § 1.